Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.050

Referrals—Disclosure statement.

(1) An agency must provide a disclosure statement to each client prior to making a referral. A disclosure statement is not required when the agency is only providing information to a person. The disclosure statement must be acknowledged by the client prior to the referral and the agency shall retain a copy of the disclosure statement and acknowledgment. Acknowledgment may be in the form of:

(a) A signature of the client or legal representative on the exact disclosure statement;

(b) An electronic signature that includes the date, time, internet provider address, and displays the exact disclosure statement document;

(c) A faxed confirmation that includes the date, time, and fax number and displaying the exact disclosure statement document; or

(d) In instances where a vulnerable adult chooses not to sign or otherwise provide acknowledgment of the disclosure statement, the referral professional or agency may satisfy the acknowledgment requirement of this subsection (1) by documenting the client's refusal to sign.

(2) The disclosure statement must be dated and must contain the following information:

(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the agency;

(b) The name of the client;

(c) The amount of the fee to be received from the client, if any. Alternatively, if the fee is to be received from the provider, the method of computation of the fee and the time and method of payment. In addition, the agency shall disclose to the client the amount of fee to be received from the provider, if the client requests such information;

(d) A clear description of the services provided by the agency in general, and to be provided specifically for the client;

(e) A provision stating that the agency may not require or request clients to sign waivers of potential liability for losses of personal property or injury, or to sign waivers of any rights of the client established in state or federal law;

(f) A provision stating that the agency works with both the client and the care services or supportive housing provider in the same transaction, and an explanation that the agency will need the client's authorization to obtain or disclose confidential health care information;

(g) A statement indicating the frequency on which the agency regularly tours provider facilities, and that, at the time of referral, the agency will inform the client in writing or by electronic means if the agency has toured the referred supportive housing provider or providers, and if so, the most recent date that tour took place;

(h) A provision stating that the client may, without cause, stop using the agency or switch to another agency without penalty or cancellation fee to the client;

(i) An explanation of the agency's refund of fees policy, which must be consistent with RCW 18.330.090;

(j) A statement that the client may file a complaint with the attorney general's office for violations of this chapter, including the name, address, and telephone number of the consumer protection division of that office; and

(k) If the agency or its personnel who are directly involved in providing referrals to clients, including the personnel's immediate family members, have an ownership interest in the supportive housing or care services to which the client is given a referral, a provision stating that the agency or such personnel or their immediate family members have an ownership interest in the supportive housing or care services to which the client is given referral services, and, if such ownership interest exists, an explanation of that interest.

[ 2011 c 357 s 6.]